Arkansas, session 2025, SB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-56-107(d)(4)(A), concerning digital
currency, is reenacted to ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision
Commission to change "does not require" to "does not prohibit" and "from
compliance with" to "from complying with" in order to correct a grammatical
error.
(4)(A) This section does not prohibit a financial institution,
or an officer, employee, or agent of a financial institution, from complying
with the Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978, Pub. L. No. 95-630, the Bank
Secrecy Act, Pub. L. No. 91-508, or Federal Financial Institutions
Examination Council regulations, including without limitation currency
transaction reports and suspicious activity reports.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
*ANS001*
01/31/2025 10:28:30 AM ANS001

SB171
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.























01/31/2025 10:28:30 AM ANS001